Hawaii statutes.
§708-814 Criminal trespass in the second
degree. (1) A person commits the offense of criminal trespass in the
second degree if:

(a) The person knowingly enters or remains
unlawfully in or upon premises that are enclosed in a manner designed to
exclude intruders or are fenced;

(b) The person enters or remains unlawfully in or
upon commercial premises after a reasonable warning or request to leave by the
owner or lessee of the commercial premises, the owner's or lessee's authorized
agent, or a police officer; provided that this paragraph shall not apply to any
conduct or activity subject to regulation by the National Labor Relations Act.

For the purposes of this paragraph,
"reasonable warning or request" means a warning or request
communicated in writing at any time within a one-year period inclusive of the
date the incident occurred, which may contain but is not limited to the
following information:

(i) A warning statement advising the person
that the person's presence is no longer desired on the property for a period of
one year from the date of the notice, that a violation of the warning will
subject the person to arrest and prosecution for trespassing pursuant to
section 708‑814(1)(b), and that criminal trespass in the second degree is
a petty misdemeanor;

(ii) The legal name, any aliases, and a
photograph, if practicable, or a physical description, including but not
limited to sex, racial extraction, age, height, weight, hair color, eye color,
or any other distinguishing characteristics of the person warned;

(iii) The name of the person giving the warning
along with the date and time the warning was given; and

(iv) The signature of the person giving the
warning, the signature of a witness or police officer who was present when the
warning was given and, if possible, the signature of the violator;

(c) The person enters or remains unlawfully on
agricultural lands without the permission of the owner of the land, the owner's
agent, or the person in lawful possession of the land, and the agricultural
lands:

(i) Are fenced, enclosed, or secured in a
manner designed to exclude intruders;

(ii) Have a sign or signs displayed on the
unenclosed cultivated or uncultivated agricultural land sufficient to give
notice and reading as follows: "Private Property". The sign or
signs, containing letters not less than two inches in height, shall be placed
along the boundary line of the land and at roads and trails entering the land
in a manner and position as to be clearly noticeable from outside the boundary
line; or

(iii) At the time of entry, are fallow or have a
visible presence of livestock or a crop:

(A) Under cultivation;

(B) In the process of being harvested; or

(C) That has been harvested;

(d) The person enters or remains unlawfully on unimproved
or unused lands without the permission of the owner of the land, the owner's
agent, or the person in lawful possession of the land, and the lands:

(i) Are fenced, enclosed, or secured in a
manner designed to exclude the general public; or

(ii) Have a sign or signs displayed on the
unenclosed, unimproved, or unused land sufficient to give reasonable notice and
reads as follows: "Private Property – No Trespassing",
"Government Property – No Trespassing", or a substantially similar
message; provided that the sign or signs shall contain letters not less than
two inches in height and shall be placed at reasonable intervals along the
boundary line of the land and at roads and trails entering the land in a manner
and position as to be clearly noticeable from outside the boundary line.

For the purposes of this paragraph,
"unimproved or unused lands" means any land upon which there is no
improvement; construction of any structure, building, or facility; or
alteration of the land by grading, dredging, or mining that would cause a
permanent change in the land or that would change the basic natural condition
of the land. Land remains "unimproved or unused land" under this
paragraph notwithstanding minor improvements, including the installation or
maintenance of utility poles, signage, and irrigation facilities or systems;
minor alterations undertaken for the preservation or prudent management of the
unimproved or unused land, including the installation or maintenance of fences,
trails, or pathways; maintenance activities, including forest plantings and the
removal of weeds, brush, rocks, boulders, or trees; and the removal or securing
of rocks or boulders undertaken to reduce risk to downslope properties; or

(e) The person enters or remains unlawfully in or
upon the premises of any public housing project or state low-income housing
project, as defined in section 356D-1, 356D-51, or 356D-91, after a reasonable
warning or request to leave by housing authorities or a police officer, based
upon an alleged violation of law or administrative rule; provided that a
warning or request to leave shall not be necessary between 10:00 p.m. and 5:00
a.m. at any public housing project or state low-income housing project that is
closed to the public during those hours and has signs, containing letters not
less than two inches in height, placed along the boundary of the project
property, at all entrances to the property, in a manner and position to be
clearly noticeable from outside the boundary of the project property and to give
sufficient notice that the public housing project or state low-income housing
project is closed to the public during those hours.

(2) Subsection (1) shall not apply to a
process server who enters or remains in or upon the land or premises of another,
unless the land or premises are secured with a fence and locked gate, for the
purpose of making a good faith attempt to perform their legal duties and to
serve process upon any of the following:

(a) An owner or occupant of the land or premises;

(b) An agent of the owner or occupant of the land or
premises; or

(c) A lessee of the land or premises.

(3) As used in this section:

"Housing authorities" means resident
managers or managers, tenant monitors, security guards, or others officially
designated by the Hawaii public housing authority.

"Process server" means any person
authorized under the Hawaii rules of civil procedure, district court rules of
civil procedure, Hawaii family court rules, or section 353C-10 to serve
process.

(4) Criminal trespass in the second degree is
a petty misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1974, c 49, §1; am L 1979, c
201, §1; am L 1980, c 232, §40; am L 1981, c 177, §2; gen ch 1993; am L 1998, c
146, §1; am L 2004, c 50, §2; am L 2005, c 181, §2 and c 212, §3; am L 2011, c
208, §2; am L 2013, c 145, §1; am L 2015, c 101, §3]

Case Notes

Where defendant failed to adduce sufficient evidence to
support claim of the exercise of a constitutionally protected native Hawaiian
right and knowingly entered landowner's property which was fenced in a manner
to exclude others, trial court properly concluded that defendant was unlawfully
on property in violation of subsection (1). 89 H. 177, 970 P.2d 485 (1998).

Where persons were allowed on hotel premises if invited by
hotel guests, State had burden to prove that defendants were not so invited. 2
H. App. 264, 630 P.2d 129 (1981).

As criminal liability in section (1993) based only on
contemporaneous refusal to obey warning or request to leave premises, no
conviction where defendant returned to bar more than a month after being given
warning not to return to premises for a year. 80 H. 372 (App.), 910 P.2d 143
(1996).

Finding by court that property was "commercial premises"
protected by this section not clearly erroneous. 80 H. 460 (App.), 911 P.2d 95
(1996).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next